Utah statutes.
41-12a-303.   Condition to obtaining registration, license plates, or safety
inspection.
The owner of a motor vehicle required to maintain owner's security under
Section 41-12a-301 may be required to swear or affirm, in a manner specified
by the State Tax Commission, or present other reasonable evidence that he has
owner's security in effect at the time of registering, obtaining license
plates for, or a safety inspection of the motor vehicle.
